Maryland, session 2025, HB1233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–306.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) “Community solar energy generating system” means a solar energy
system that:
(i) is connected to the electric distribution grid serving the State;
(ii) [is located in the same electric service territory as its subscribers;
(iii)] is attached to the electric meter of a subscriber or is a separate
facility with its own electric meter;
[(iv)] (III) credits its generated electricity, or the value of its
generated electricity, to the bills of the subscribers to that system through virtual net
energy metering;
[(v)] (IV) has at least two subscribers but no limit to the maximum
number of subscribers;
[(vi)] (V) does not have subscriptions larger than 200 kilowatts
constituting more than 60% of its kilowatt–hour output;
[(vii)] (VI) has a generating capacity that does not exceed 5
megawatts as measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
[(viii)] (VII) may be owned by any person; and
[(ix)] (VIII) with respect to community solar energy generating
systems constructed under the Program, serves at least 40% of its kilowatt–hour output to
LMI subscribers unless the solar energy system is wholly owned by the subscribers to the
solar energy system.
(7) “LMI subscriber” means a subscriber that:
(i) is low–income;
(ii) is moderate–income; or
(iii) resides in a census tract that is an:

HOUSE BILL 1233 3
1. overburdened community; [and] OR
2. underserved community.
(8) “Low–income” means:
(i) having an annual household income that is at or below 200% of
the federal poverty level; or
(ii) being certified as eligible for any federal, State, or local
assistance program that limits participation to households whose income is at or below
200% of the federal poverty level.
(9) “Moderate–income” means having an annual household income that is
at or below 80% of the median income for Maryland.
(12) “Program” means the Community Solar Energy Generating Systems
Program.
(14) “Subscriber” means a retail customer of an electric company that:
(i) holds a subscription to a community solar energy generating
system; and
(ii) has identified one or more individual meters or accounts to which
the subscription shall be attributed.
(b) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) community solar energy generating systems:
(i) provide residents and businesses, including those that lease
property, increased access to local solar electricity while encouraging private investment in
solar resources;
(ii) enhance continued diversification of the State’s energy resource
mix to achieve the State’s renewable energy portfolio standard and Greenhouse Gas
Emissions Reduction Act goals; and
(iii) provide electric companies and ratepayers the opportunity to
realize the many benefits associated with distributed energy; and
(2) it is in the public interest that the State enable the development and
deployment of energy generation from community solar energy generating systems in order
to:

HOUSE BILL 1233
(i) allow renters and low–income and moderate–income retail
electric customers to own an interest in a community solar energy generating system;
(ii) facilitate market entry for all potential subscribers while giving
priority to subscribers who are the most sensitive to market barriers; and
(iii) encourage developers to promote participation by renters and
low–income and moderate–income retail electric customers.
(c) A community solar energy generating system, subscriber, subscriber
organization, or subscription coordinator is not:
(1) an electric company;
(2) an electricity supplier; or
(3) a generating station if the generating capacity of the community solar
energy generating system does not exceed 2 megawatts.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall establish and maintain a Community
Solar Energy Generating Systems Program.
(ii) The structure of the Program is as provided in this subsection.
(2) All rate classes may participate in the Program.
(3) (I) Subscribers served by electric standard offer service, community
choice aggregators, and electricity suppliers may hold subscriptions to the same community
solar energy generating system.
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A SUBSCRIBER MUST RESIDE IN THE SAME ELECTRIC
SERVICE TERRITORY AS THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM TO
WHICH THE SUBSCRIBER HOLDS A SUBSCRIPTION.
2. AN LMI SUBSCRIBER MAY HOLD A SUBSCRIPTION TO
A COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM LOCATED IN A DIFFERENT
ELECTRIC SERVICE TERRITORY THAN THE ONE IN WHICH THE LMI SUBSCRIBER
RESIDES.
(j) (2) (i) This paragraph applies to electric companies, electric
cooperatives, and municipal utilities that participate in the Program.
(ii) A subscriber who has a change in the service address associated
with the subscriber’s subscription may maintain the subscription for the new address if the
new address is within the same electric territory as the old address.

HOUSE BILL 1233 5
(iii) An electric company or a subscriber organization may not
terminate a subscriber’s subscription due to a change of address for the service address
associated with the subscription if the requirements under subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph are met.
(iv) An electric company shall make any changes necessary to
accommodate a subscriber’s change of address on notification by a subscriber organization.
(O) (1) AN LMI SUBSCRIBER THAT RESIDES IN A DIFFERENT ELECTRIC
SERVICE TERRITORY THAN THE COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM
SHALL RECEIVE THE SAME BILL CREDIT VALUE AS AN LMI SUBSCRIBER THAT
RESIDES IN THE SAME ELECTRIC SERVICE TERRITORY AS THE COMMUNITY SOLAR
ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM.
(2) BY ORDER OR REGULATION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH
A PROCESS FOR THE EXCHANGE OF COMMUNITY SOLAR BILL CREDITS BETWEEN
COMMUNITY SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT ARE LOCATED IN
DIFFERENT ELECTRIC SERVICE TERRITORIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.